fr: Application de la graisse: Joint à rotule; Goupilles de guidage d’étrier de frein; Joint homocinétique; Châssis; Marine; Roulement de roue de remorque; Joint universel; Roulement de roue; Autre
hu: Zsír alkalmazása: Gömbcsukló; Féknyereg csúszócsapok; Féltengelycsukló (CV); Alváz; Hajózási; Utánfutó kerékcsapágy; Kardáncsukló; Kerékcsapágy; Egyéb
lt-LT: Tepalo paskirtis: Rutuliniam šarnyrui; Stabdžių suporto kreipiančiosioms; CV šarnyrui; Važiuoklei; Laivybai; Priekabos rato guoliui; Kardaniniam šarnyrui; Rato guoliui; Kita
pl: Zastosowanie smaru: Przegub kulowy; Prowadnice zacisku hamulcowego; Przegub homokinetyczny; Podwozie; Morski; Łożysko koła przyczepy; Przegub krzyżakowy; Łożysko koła; Inne
ru: Назначение смазки: Шаровая опора; Направляющие суппорта; ШРУС; Шасси; Судовая техника; Подшипник колеса прицепа; Крестовина карданного вала; Ступичный подшипник; Другое
de: Verwendungszweck des Schmierfetts: Kugelgelenk; Führungsbolzen (Bremssattel); Gleichlaufgelenk; Fahrgestell; Marine; Radlager (Anhänger); Kreuzgelenk; Radlager; Andere
bg-BG: Предназначение на греста: Сферичен шарнир; Водачи на спирачния апарат; Каре (CV шарнир); Шаси; Морско приложение; Лагер за колело на ремарке; Карданен шарнир; Лагер на колело; Други
sv: Användningsområde för fett: Kulled; Bromsokets glidpinnar; Drivknut; Chassi; Marin; Hjullager för släpvagn; Knutkors; Hjullager; Annan
pt-BR: Graxa aplicação: Junta esférica; Pinos deslizantes da pinça de freio; Junta homocinética; Chassi; Náutica; Rolamento de roda de reboque; Junta universal; Rolamento de roda; Outro
sk-SK: Aplikácia tuku: Guľový čap; Vodiace čapy brzdového strmeňa; Homokinetický kĺb; Podvozok; Námorné; Ložisko kolesa prívesu; Kardanový kĺb; Ložisko kolesa; Iné
vi: Bôi mỡ bôi trơn: Khớp cầu; Chốt trượt heo dầu phanh; Khớp CV; Khung gầm; Tàu thủy; Vòng bi bánh xe rơ-moóc; Khớp chữ U; Vòng bi bánh xe; Khác
pt-PT: Aplicativo Grease: Rótula de suspensão; Pinos de guia da pinça de travão; Junta homocinética; Chassis; Marinha; Rolamento de roda de reboque; Junta universal; Rolamento de roda; Outro
fi: Voiteluaineen käyttäminen: Pallonivel; Jarrusatulan liukutapit; Vetonivel; Alusta; Vene; Perävaunun pyöränlaakeri; Ristinivel; Pyöränlaakeri; Muu
ja: グリース適用: ボールジョイント; ブレーキキャリパースライドピン; CVジョイント; シャーシ; マリン; トレーラーホイールベアリング; Uジョイント; ホイールベアリング; その他
zh-TW: 潤滑脂用途: 球接頭; 煞車卡鉗滑動銷; 等速萬向接頭 (CV 接頭); 底盤; 航海; 拖車輪轂軸承; 萬向接頭 (U 型接頭); 輪轂軸承; 其他
el: Εφαρμογή γράσου: Σφαιρικός σύνδεσμος (μπαλάκι); Πείροι δαγκάνας φρένων; Μπιλιοφόρος; Σασί; Ναυτική χρήση; Ρουλεμάν τροχού τρέιλερ; Σταυρός άξονα (U-joint); Ρουλεμάν τροχού; Άλλο
hr-HR: Aplikacija masti: Kuglasti zglob; Klizni klinovi kočionih čeljusti; Homokinetički zglob; Šasija; Nautika; Ležaj kotača prikolice; Kardanski zglob; Ležaj kotača; Ostalo
da: Påføring af fedt: Kugleled; Bremsekaliberens glidestifter; CV-led; Chassis; Marine; Hjulleje til trailer; Krydsled; Hjulleje; Anden
th: การใช้งานจาระบี: ลูกหมาก; สลักคาลิปเปอร์เบรก; หัวเพลาขับ (CV joint); แชสซี; สำหรับเรือ; ลูกปืนล้อรถพ่วง; ข้อต่อกากบาท (U-joint); ลูกปืนล้อ; อื่นๆ
cs: Účel použití plastického maziva: Kulový čep; Vodicí čepy brzdového třmenu; Homokinetický kloub; Podvozek; Lodní technika; Ložisko kola přívěsu; Křížový kloub; Ložisko kola; Ostatní
nb: Grease-appen: Kuleledd; Glidepinner for bremsecaliper; Drivknute; Chassis; Maritimt; Hjullager til tilhenger; Kryssledd; Hjullager; Annet
zh-CN: 润滑脂应用: 球头销; 制动卡钳导向销; 等速万向节; 底盘; 航海; 拖车轮毂轴承; 万向节; 轮毂轴承; 其他
ro-RO: Aplicarea unsorii: Articulație sferică; Bolțuri de ghidare pentru etrier de frână; Articulație planetară (CV); Șasiu; Marin; Rulment de roată pentru remorcă; Articulație cardanică; Rulment de roată; Altele
nl: Smeervet toepassing: Kogelgewricht; Glijpennen van remklauw; Homokineet; Chassis; Maritiem; Wiellager van aanhanger; Kruiskoppeling; Wiellager; Anders
ko: 그리스 용도: 볼 조인트; 브레이크 캘리퍼 슬라이드 핀; CV 조인트; 섀시; 해양용; 트레일러 휠 베어링; U 조인트; 휠 베어링; 기타
sl-SI: Uporaba masti: Krogelni zglob; Drsni zatiči zavorne čeljusti; Homokinetični zglob; Podvozje; Navtika; Kolesni ležaj prikolice; Kardanski zglob; Kolesni ležaj; Drugo
it: App Grease: Giunto sferico; Perni di scorrimento pinza freno; Giunto omocinetico; Telaio; Marino; Cuscinetto ruota rimorchio; Giunto cardanico; Cuscinetto ruota; Altro
es: Aplicación de grasa: Rótula; Pasadores de deslizamiento de pinza de freno; Junta homocinética; Chasis; Marino; Rodamiento de rueda de remolque; Junta universal; Rodamiento de rueda; Otra
tr: Yağlama uygulaması: Rotil; Fren kaliperi kayar pimleri; CV mafsalı; Şasi; Marin; Römork tekerlek rulmanı; U mafsal; Tekerlek rulmanı; Diğer
en: Grease application: Ball joint; Brake caliper slide pins; CV joint; Chassis; Marine; Trailer wheel bearing; U-joint; Wheel bearing; Other